Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 11

State Employee Legacy Pension Stabilization Reserve Trust

9-4-1101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Legacy pension plan” means the Tennessee consolidated retirement system that is established in title 8, chapters 34 - 37, excluding the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers, compiled in title 8, chapter 36, part 9;

“State employee” means any person who is a state official, including members of the general assembly, the attorney general and reporter, district attorneys general, state judges, and district public defenders, or any person who is employed in the service of and whose compensation is payable by the state, or any person who is employed by the state whose compensation is paid in whole or in part from federal or other funds. “State employee” also means any person who is employed in the service of and whose compensation is payable by a public institution of higher education, or any person who is employed by a public institution of higher education whose compensation is paid in whole or in part from federal or other funds; and

“Trustees” means the five (5) trustees designated in § 9-4-1002.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1102. State employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund.

The state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust is created. The state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund shall be established and funded through appropriations made in the general appropriations act from time to time for such purpose. The trust and the funds therein shall be administered by the department of the treasury. The trust fund shall be an irrevocable trust exclusively for the benefit of state employees who are members of the legacy plan. The assets of the trust fund shall be preserved, invested, and expended solely pursuant to and for the purposes of this part and shall not be loaned or otherwise transferred or used for any other purpose. It shall be impossible, at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to state employees and their beneficiaries under the legacy pension plan and this trust, for any part of the corpus or income of the trust to be used or diverted for purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of the state employees or their beneficiaries. The attorney general and reporter shall approve the terms of the trust instrument.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7; 2018, ch. 590, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1103. Chair of trustees.

The comptroller of the treasury shall serve as the chair of the trustees and shall preside over all meetings and proceedings of the trustees.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1104. Investment policy — Charge for administrative and investment expenses.

The trustees shall adopt an investment policy authorizing how assets in the trust may be invested. The policy shall not authorize assets in the trust to be invested in any instrument, obligation, security, or property that would not constitute a legal investment for assets of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system. The state treasurer shall be responsible for the investment and reinvestment of trust funds in accordance with the policies and guidelines established by the trustees.

The funds transferred or deposited into the trust may be commingled with, co-invested with, and invested or reinvested with other assets transferred or deposited into the trust. All or a portion of the trust may be invested, reinvested, and co-invested with other funds, not a part of the trust, which are held by the state treasurer, including, but not limited to, assets of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system and the state pooled investment fund established pursuant to part 6 of this chapter. The assets of the trust may also be co-invested in a group trust in accordance with § 8-37-104(f).

The state treasurer shall assess a charge to the trust, in an amount to be determined by the treasurer, to meet the administrative and investment expenses of the treasury department in providing services under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7; 2018, ch. 590, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1105. Purpose of trust fund — Certification of amount needed to fund increase in employer contribution rate — Use of assets.

As provided in this section, the purpose of the state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund is to protect state employee members of the legacy plan from a reduction or erosion of funds in the legacy plan that are necessary to pay benefits provided by the plan. If in any given year, the actuarially determined employer contribution rate for state employees exceeds the actuarially determined employer contribution rate for state employees as of fiscal year 2018, the board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system may certify to the trustees of the trust the amount necessary to fund the increase in the employer contribution rate for that year. Upon receipt of the certification, the trustees of the trust shall determine whether transferring all or a portion of the requested amount from the state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund would be in the best interests of the trust beneficiaries. If it is, the trustees shall direct the treasurer to transfer such amount as the trustees shall determine from the state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund to the state accumulation fund of the legacy plan.

The assets of the state employee legacy pension stabilization reserve trust fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose set forth in this section and to pay the reasonable expenses incurred in administering and investing the trust assets.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1106. Annual financial reports.

The trustees shall prepare annual financial reports following the close of each fiscal year relative to the activities of the trust. The annual reports, all books, accounts, and financial records of the trust shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 7 enacted a new part 58, §§9-4-5801 —9-4-5806, but the part has been redesignated as part 11, §§9-4-1101 —9-4-1106 by authority of the Code Commission.